en: Portuguese rums
de: Portugiesischer Rum
es: Rones portugueses
fr: Rhums portugais
hr: Portugalski rumovi
hu: Portugál rumok
nl: Portugese rum
pt: Rum português

en: Barbadian rum
de: Rum aus Barbados
fr: Rhums barbadiens, Rhum barbadien
hr: Barbadoški rum
nl: Barbados rums, Barbados-rum, Barbados rum

en: Cuban rums, Rums from Cuba
de: Kubanische Rums
fr: Rhums cubains, Rhum cubain
hr: Kubanski rumovi
hu: Kubai rumok
nl: Cubaanse rums, Rum uit Cuba
pl: Rum kubański
ro: Rom cubanez, Rom Cuba

en: Dominican rums
bg: Доминикански ром
de: Dominikanische Rums
fr: Rhums dominicains, Rhum dominicain
hr: Dominikanski rumovi
hu: Dominikai rumok
nl: Dominicaanse rums, Dominicaanse rum

en: French rums
bg: Френски ром
de: Französische Rums
fr: Rhums français, Rhum français
hr: Francuski rumovi
hu: Francia rumok
nl: Franse rums, Franse rum

en: Haitian rums, Rums from Haiti
de: Haitianische Rums
es: Rones haitianos, Rones de Haití
fr: Rhums haïtiens
hr: Haićanski rumovi
it: Rum haitiani, Rum da Haiti
nl: Haitiaanse rums, Rum uit Haïti
pl: Rum haitański
pt: Rums haitianos, Rums do Haiti
ro: Rom haitian, Rom Haiti

en: Jamaican rum, Rums from Jamaica
de: Jamaikanische Rums
fr: Rhums jamaïcains
hr: Jamajčanski rum
hu: Jamaicai rumok
nl: Jamaicaanse rums, Rum uit Jamaica
ro: Rom jamaican, Rom Jamaica

en: Agricultural rums, rhums agricoles
de: Rhum agricole, Agricole Rum
es: Rones agrícolas
fi: Maatalousrommit
fr: Rhums agricoles, rhum agricole
hr: Poljoprivredni rumovi
it: Rum agricoli
nl: Agrarische rums
pt: Rums agrícolas
zh: 农业朗姆酒

en: Amber rum, dark rum
de: Dunkler Rum
fr: Rhums ambrés, rhum ambré
hr: Jantarni rum
nl: Donkere rums
zh: 琥珀朗姆酒

en: White rums, white rum
de: Weiße Rums
fi: vaaleat rommit
fr: Rhums blancs, rhum blanc
hr: Bijeli rumovi
hu: Fehér rum
nl: Blanke rums, Blanke rum
pl: Rum biały, Biały rum
ro: Rom alb

en: Brown rum
de: Braune Rums
fr: Rhums bruns, rhum brun
hr: Smeđi rum
hu: Barna rum
nl: Bruine rums, Bruine rum
pl: Rum brązowy

fr: Rhums industriels, rhum industriel
de: Industrieller Rum
nl: Industriële rums

en: old rums, old rum
de: Alter Rum
fr: Rhums vieux, rhum vieux
hr: Stari rumovi
nl: Oude rums, Oude rum

en: Cachaça, pinga, caninha
xx: Cachaça, pinga
fr: Cachaça, pinga, cachasa, cachase

en: Grain spirits
de: Getreidebrände
fr: Eaux-de-vie de céréales
hr: Žitna žestoka pića
nl: Graanbrandewijnen

en: German grain spirit
de: Deutscher Kornbrand
fr: Eau-de-vie de céréales allemande
hr: Njemački žitni rakija
nl: Duitse graanbrandewijn

en: Vodka
bg: Водка
de: Wodkas, Wodka
es: Vodkas, Vodka
fi: votka
fr: Vodkas, Vodka
hr: Votka
hu: Vodkák, Vodka
it: Vodka
ja: ウォッカ
lt: Vodka, degtinė
nl: Wodkas, Wodka
pl: Wódka
ro: Vodcă, Vodka
ru: Водка
zh: 伏特加

en: Flavored vodka, flavoured vodka
de: Aromatisierter Wodka, Geschmackvoller Wodka
es: Vodka con sabor, vodka aromatizada
fr: Vodka aromatisée, vodka parfumée
hr: Votka s okusom
hu: Ízesített vodka
it: Vodka aromatizzato, Vodka con aroma

en: Nastoyka
ru: настойка

en: Vodkas from Lithania, Lithuanian vodka
de: Litauischer Wodka, Litauische Wodkas
es: Vodka lituano, Vodkas lituanas
fr: Vodkas lithuaniennes, Vodka lituanienne
hr: Votke iz litve
it: Vodka lituana
lt: Lietuviška degtinė
nl: Wodkas uit Litouwen, Litouwse wodkas
pl: Wódki litewskie, Litewska wódka
ru: Литовская водка